Illinois, session 104th, HB4945.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.118b as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.118b new)7    Sec. 2-3.118b. Guidance on preparing students for a 8technology future.9    (a) The General Assembly finds that this State has been a 10leader in technology innovation and a growing leader in 11attracting and retaining talent in some of the fastest-growing 12industries and sectors, including quantum computing. With the 13rapid growth of new technologies, such as artificial 14intelligence and quantum computing, in the home, classroom, 15and workplace, the General Assembly finds that this State must 16ensure that its students are being prepared in technological 17literacy and meet employer workforce needs of the future today 18through the adoption of a new and innovative educational 19curriculum and partnerships.20    (b) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of 21Education, in consultation with other relevant State agencies, 22may provide statewide guidance to school districts concerning 23a workforce development curriculum or programming or both that   HB4945- 2 -LRB104 18797 LNS 32240 b1can be adopted at the school district, school, or classroom 2level and that provides best practices for teaching artificial 3intelligence, quantum computing, and other types of rapidly 4growing technologies as deemed necessary, in a manner that 5prepares students for workforce, job, and career competencies 6in the future and informs students of new or growing job or 7career opportunities in these new fields.8    (c) In preparing the guidance under subsection (a), the 9State Board may partner with or consult employers, business 10organizations, career-focused not-for-profit entities, 11educational organizations, and other stakeholders in 12developing this curriculum or programming.13    (d) The State Board shall prepare a comprehensive review 14of any workforce development preparation curriculum and 15programming specifically designed around technology, such as 16artificial intelligence and quantum computing, implemented or 17considered in other states through other state actions, 18policies, pilot programs, or school-based programs implemented 19or tested on a statewide or school-district basis.20    (e) The State Superintendent of Education may convene 21meetings with stakeholders from the public or private sector 22in preparing the guidance under this Section and may allow for 23the submission of public comments from individuals, 24organizations, or other entities prior to finalizing the 25prepared guidance. If the State Board allows for the 26submission of public comments, the State Board shall publish,   HB4945- 3 -LRB104 18797 LNS 32240 b1via electronic means, any and all materials submitted to the 2State Board.